Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-9] Prejudgment and judgment
interest. (a) With respect to a foreign-money claim, recovery of
prejudgment interest and the rate of interest to be applied in the action or
distribution proceeding are matters of the substantive law governing the right
to recovery under the conflict of laws rules of this State.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an
increase or decrease in the amount of prejudgment interest otherwise payable
may be made in a foreign-money judgment to the extent required by the law of
this State governing a failure to make or accept an offer of settlement or
offer of judgment, or conduct by a party or its attorney causing undue delay or
expense.

(c) A judgment on a foreign-money claim bears
interest at the same rate applicable to other judgments of this State. [L 1990,
c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next